Illinois, session 104th, HB771.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Public Utilities Act is amended by changing 5Section 1-101 as follows: 6    (220 ILCS 5/1-101)  (from Ch. 111 2/3, par. 1-101)7    Sec. 1-101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Public Utilities Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1475.)